test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-ilesj_gt-norm.yaml
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu2: [иленакэдинзь, иленякэдинзь]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu3: [иленакэханзь, иленякэханзь]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl1: [иленакэваць , иленякэваць]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl2: [иленакэдаць , иленякэдаць]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl3: [иленакыць, иленакэць, иленякыць, иленякэць]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg1: [иленакэдамзь, иленякэдамзь]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg2: [иленакэнась, иленякэнась]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg3: [иленакысь, иленакэсь, иленякысь, иленякэсь]
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScDu1: илевнаниʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScDu2: илевнадиʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScDu3: илевнахаʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScPl1: илевнаваˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScPl2: илевнадаˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScPl3: илевнаˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScSg1: илевнадмʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScSg2: илевнан
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScSg3: илевна
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScDu1: илеванӈгабяниʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScDu2: илеванӈгабядиʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScDu3: илеванӈгабяхаʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScPl1: илеванӈгабяваˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScPl2: илеванӈгабядаˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScPl3: илеванӈгабяˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScSg1: илеванӈгабядмʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScSg2: илеванӈгабян
     илесь+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScSg3: илеванӈгабя
     илесь+V+IV+Opt+ScDu3: илеяхаʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Opt+ScPl3: илеяˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Opt+ScSg3: илея
     илесь+V+IV+PrcFut: илеванда   
     илесь+V+IV+PrcImprf: [илена, иленя]
     илесь+V+IV+PrcNeg: илевдавэй
     илесь+V+IV+PrcPrf: илевы
     илесь+V+IV+Prec+Hort+ScDu1: [илехэрцюниʼ, илехарцьниʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Prec+Hort+ScPl1: [илехэрцюваˮ, илехарцьваˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Prec+Hort+ScSg1: [илехарцюдмʼ, илехарцядмʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Prec+Imprt+ScDu2: илехэрӈадиʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Prec+Imprt+ScPl2: илехэрӈадаˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Prec+Imprt+ScSg2: илехэрˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Prec+Opt+ScDu3: илехэрӈаяхаʼ
     илесь+V+IV+Prec+Opt+ScPl3: илехэрӈаяˮ
     илесь+V+IV+Prec+Opt+ScSg3: илехэрӈая
     илесь+V+IV+Subord+Abs: илебˮ  
     илесь+V+IV+Subord+PxDu1: [илебˮнаниʼ, илебаˮнаниʼ, илебаˮниʼ, илебˮниʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Subord+PxDu2: [илебˮнандиʼ, илебаˮнандиʼ, илебаˮтиʼ, илебтиʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Subord+PxDu3: [илебˮнандиʼ, илебаˮнандиʼ, илебаˮтиʼ, илебтиʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Subord+PxPl1: [илебˮнанаˮ, илебаˮнанаˮ, илебаˮнаˮ, илебˮнаˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Subord+PxPl2: [илебˮнандаˮ, илебаˮнандаˮ, илебатаˮ, илебтаˮ]
     илесь+V+IV+Subord+PxPl3: [илебˮнандоʼ, илебаˮнандоʼ, илебатоʼ, илебтоʼ]
     илесь+V+IV+Subord+PxSg1: [илебˮнан, илебаˮнан, илебаˮн]
     илесь+V+IV+Subord+PxSg2: [илебˮнанд, илебаˮнанд, илебат]
     илесь+V+IV+Subord+PxSg3: [илебˮнанда, илебаˮнанда, илебата, илебта] 
